Washington statutes.
RCW 19.40.902

Supplementary provisions.

Unless displaced by the provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity, including the law merchant and the law relating to principal and agent, estoppel, laches, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, insolvency, or other validating or invalidating cause, supplement its provisions.

[ 1987 c 444 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1987 c 444: See note following RCW 19.40.011.